Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.10.030

Display of United States flag.

Every board of trustees or board of regents shall cause a United States flag being in good condition to be displayed on the campus of their respective state institution of higher education during the hours of nine o'clock a.m. and four o'clock p.m. on school days, except during inclement weather.

[ 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28B.10.030. Prior: 1939 c 17 s 1; RRS s 4531-1. Formerly RCW 28.76.030.]